tables/no-no-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Norwegian literary braille, 6-dot, contracted level 2
#
#-name: Norsk litterær punktskrift, 6-punkt, kortskrift nivå 2
#-index-name: Norwegian, contracted, grade 2
#-display-name: Norwegian grade 2 contracted braille
#
#+language:no
#+language:nb
#+language:nn
#+type:literary
#+direction:both
#+dots:6
#+grade:2
#+contraction:partial
#
#  Copyright (C) 2005 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2009, 2025-2026 Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
#-copyright: 2005, ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#-copyright: 2009, 2025-2026, Lars Bjørndal
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Created June 9, 2005 by Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com> with
# help and guidance from Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>.
# Modified Sep 30, 2005 by LU
# Heavily overworked by lars@lamasti.net, 2009 and 2025.
#
#-author: Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com>
#-author: Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
# Official norwegian braille specifications are collected here:
# http://liblouis.io/braille-specs/norwegian
# This specific table is based on the document "Kortskrift i norsk punktskrift - KS04".
#
# Input is expected to be normalized to NFC (fully composed)
#-unicode-form:nfc
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

include no-no-g1.ctb

#------------------------------------------------------

# -------------- level 2 contractions -----------------
word absolutt 1-12-234
contraction abs
word absolutte 1-12-234-15
contraction abse
word akkurat 1-13-1235
contraction akr
word aldri 1-24
contraction ai
word alle 1-15
contraction ae
word alles 1-15-234
contraction aes
word allerede 1-123-1235
contraction alr
word alltid 1-2345-145
contraction atd
word altfor 1-1246
word altså 1-16
contraction aå

word andre 1-12356
begword andre 1-12356
word are 1-1235-15 # exception
word ares 1-1235-15-234 # exception

word annen 1-126
begword annen 1-126

word annerledes 1-1345-1235
contraction anr
word annet 1-346
begword annet 1-346
word annleis 1-1345-123
contraction anl

endword ar 3456
endword arde 3456-1456
endword ardes 3456-1456-234
endword arne 3456-2346
endword arnes 3456-2346-234
endword ars 3456-234
endword art 3456-2345
endword arte 3456-1256
endword artes 3456-1256-234
endword arts 3456-2345-234

word begge 12-1245
contraction bg
word begges 12-1245-234
contraction bgs
word blant 12-123
contraction bl
word blir 12-1235
contraction br
word blitt 12-2345
contraction bt
word bruk 12-13
begword bruk 12-13
contraction bk
contraction bka
begword ubruk 136-12-13
endword bruk 12-13
endword bruka 12-13-1
endword brukas 12-13-1-234
contraction bkas
endword brukar 12-13-3456
endword brukars 12-13-3456-234
endword bruke 12-13-15
endword brukes 12-13-15-234
endword bruken 12-13-126
endword brukens 12-13-126-234
endword brukene 12-13-15-2346
endword bruker 12-13-156
endword brukers 12-13-156-234
endword brukerne 12-13-145-2346
endword brukernes 12-13-156-2346-234
endword bruket 12-13-346
endword brukets 12-13-346-234
endword bruks 12-13-234
contraction bks
endword brukt 12-13-2345
contraction bkt
endword brukte 12-13-1256
endword bruktes 12-13-1256-234

# de                                      # defined in level 1 contractions
begword de 1456
word den 145-126
word dens 145-126-234
word det 145-346
word dets 145-346-234
begword ude 136-1456
endword des 1456-234

word deg 145-1245
contraction dg
word dem 145-134
contraction dm
word denne 145-2346
word dennes 145-2346-234
word der 23456
word derat 23456-1
word derblant 23456-12-123
word deretter 23456-1356
word derfra 23456-124
word derfor 23456-1246
word derfør 23456-246
word derover 23456-1346
word derpå 23456-1234
word dersom 23456-234
word dertil 23456-2345
word derunder 23456-12345
word derved 23456-1236

begword der 23456
word dere 145-12356
word deres 145-12356-234
word desse 1456-234
word dessuten 145-234-136
contraction dsu
word dessverre 145-234-1236
contraction dsv
word dette 145-1256
word dettes 145-1256-234
word din 145-1345
contraction dn
word disse 145-234
contraction ds
word disses 145-234-234
contraction dss
word ditt 145-2345
contraction dt
word diverre 145-1236
contraction dv

word dykk 145-13
contraction dk

# en							# defined in level 1
word ens 126-234									# level 2 contractions
endword ens 126-234
endword ent 126-2345
endword ents 126-2345-234
endword enne 126-2346
endword ennes 126-2346-234
# ende 126-1456                                Defined in level 1
word endes 126-1456-234
endword endes 126-1456-234
endword ente 126-1256
endword entes 126-1256-234

word enda 15-1
contraction ea
word enno 15-135
contraction eo
word ennå 15-16
contraction eå

# er							# defined in level 1
endword ers 156-234								# level 2 contractions
endword ert 156-2345
endword erts 156-2345-234
endword erne 156-2346
endword ernes 156-2346-234
endword erde 156-1456
endword erdes 156-1456-234
endword erte 156-1256
endword ertes 156-1256-234

# et

endword ets 346-234								# level 2 contractions
word ett 346-2345
endword ett 346-2345
endword etts 346-2345-234
endword etne 346-2346
endword etnes 346-2346-234
endword ette 346-1256
endword ettes 346-1256-234

# word etter 1356					# defined in level 1
begword uetter 136-1356
word etterat 1356-1
contraction za
contraction zbk
word etterble 1356-12
contraction zb
word etterblitt 1356-12-2345
contraction zbt
contraction zfg
word ettergang 1356-1245-1245
contraction zgg
word ettergjør 1356-1245-245
contraction zgj
word ettergjekk 1356-1245-245-13
contraction zgjk
# word ettersom 1356-234       Defined in level 1
# word etterpå 1356-1234   Defined in level 1
word ettergikk 1356-1245-13
contraction zgk
contraction zkm
word etternatur 1356-1345-2345
contraction znt
word ettertilgang 1356-2345-1245-1245
contraction ztgg
word ettervanske 1356-1236-14
contraction zvc

word felles 124-123-234
begword felles 124-123-234
contraction fls
word fikk 124-13
contraction fk

# word for 1246						# defined in level 1
word forfra 1246-124
word forover 1246-1346
begword forover 1246-1346

begword ufor 136-1246

# forhold 12346                                     # defined in level 1

begword uforhold 136-12346

endword forholda 12346-1
endword forholdene 12346-15-2346
endword forholdenes 12346-15-2346-234
endword forholdet 12346-346
endword forholdets 12346-346-234
endword forholds 13456-234

# word forholdsvis 12346-1236	# defined in level 1

word forskjell 1246-14
begword forskjell 1246-14
endword forskjell 1246-14
endword forskjellane 1246-14-1-2346
endword forskjellar 1246-14-3456
endword forskjellene 1246-14-15-2346
endword forskjellenes 1246-14-15-2346-234
endword forskjellen 1246-14-126
endword forskjellens 1246-14-126-234
endword forskjeller 1246-14-156
endword forskjellers 1246-14-156-234
endword forskjellig 1246-14-24-1245
endword forskjellige 1246-14-24-1245-15

# word fra 124					# defined in level 1
word fram 124-134
begword fram 124-134
contraction fm
begword ufram 136-124-134
word framgang 124-134-1245-1245
contraction fmgg
word framgikk 124-134-1245-13
contraction fmgk
contraction fmkm
word frampå 124-134-1234
contraction fmp
word framved 124-134-1236
contraction fmv
word framover 124-134-1346
contraction fmx
word frametter 124-134-1356
contraction fmz
word framunder 124-134-12345
contraction fmq
word følg 124-1245
begword følg 124-1245
contraction fg
endword følg 124-1245
endword følga 124-1245-1
contraction fga
endword følgas 124-1245-1-234
contraction fgas
endword følge 124-1245-15
contraction fge
endword følges 124-1245-15-234
contraction fges
endword følgen 124-1245-126
endword følgens 124-1245-126-234
endword følgende 124-1245-126-1456
endword følgendes 124-1245-126-1456-234
endword følgene 124-1245-15-2346
endword følgenes 124-1245-15-2346-234
endword følger 124-1245-156
endword følgers 124-1245-156-234
endword følgerne 124-1245-156-2346
endword følgernes 124-1245-156-2346-234
endword følget 124-1245-346
endword følgets 124-1245-346-234

word først 124-234-2345
begword først 124-234-2345
contraction fst
word første 124-234-1256
begword første 124-234-1256
word fått 124-2345
contraction ft

word gang 1245-1245
begword gang 1245-1245
contraction gg
word gikk 1245-13
contraction gk
word gjekk 1245-245-13
contraction gjk

# word gjennom 12456
begword ugjennom 136-12456
word gjennomgang 12456-1245-1245
begword gjennomgang 12456-1245-1245
word gjennomgikk 12456-1245-13
word gjennomgjekk 12456-1245-245-13
word gjennomfør 12456-246

word gjorde 1245-245-1456
endword gjorde 1245-245-1456
word gjort 1245-245-2345
endword gjort 1245-245-2345
contraction gjt
word gjør 1245-245
contraction gj

word hadde 125-1456								# level 2 contractions
# word han 125
# word hans 125-234
# word har 1235										# already in level 1
word hatt 125-2345
contraction ht
word hennar 15-3456
word henne 15-15
contraction ee
word hennes 15-15-234
contraction ees
word heller 125-123-156
word helst 125-123
contraction hl
# word hun 136										# already in level 1
word hverandre 2456-1-12356
word hverandres 2456-1-12356-234
word hvilke 2456-13
contraction wk
word hvilken 2456-13-126
word hvilket 2456-13-346
word hvis 2456-234
contraction ws
# hvordan 2456-145
word hvoretter 2456-1356
contraction wz
word hvorfra 2456-124
contraction wf
word hvorledes 2456-123
contraction wl
word hvorpå 2456-1234
contraction wp
word hvorved 2456-1236
contraction wv

word iallfall 24-1-124
contraction iaf
word iblant 24-12-123
contraction ibl
# word ikke 24-13				# already in level 1
word imidlertid 24-24
contraction ii
word inga 24-1
contraction ia
word ingen 24-15
contraction ie
word ingens 24-15-234
contraction ies

word ingenting 24-15-2345
contraction iet
word innenfor 24-1246
word innenfra 24-124
contraction if

word kanskje 13-13
contraction kk
word komme 13-134
contraction km
word kommer 13-134-156
word kommet 13-134-346
begword komm 13-134
begword ukomm 136-13-134
endword komm 13-134
endword komma 13-134-1
contraction kma
endword kommas 13-134-1-234
contraction kmas
endword komme 13-134-15
contraction kme
endword kommes 13-134-15-234
contraction kmes
endword kommen 13-134-126
endword kommens 13-134-126-234
endword kommene 13-134-15-2346
endword kommenes 13-134-15-2346-234
endword kommende 13-134-126-1456
endword kommendes 13-134-126-1456-234
endword kommer 13-134-156
endword kommers 13-134-156-234
endword kommerne 13-134-156-2346
endword kommernes 13-134-156-2346-234
endword kommet 13-134-346
endword kommets 13-134-346-234
word korleis 13-234
contraction ks
word kunne 13-1345
contraction kn
word kunnet 13-1345-346
word kvarandre 1-1-12356
word kvarandres 1-1-12356-234
word kvifor 13-1246

word likedan 123-145
contraction ld
word likesom 123-234
contraction ls
word liketil 123-2345
contraction lt
word likevel 123-123
contraction ll
word liksom 123-13-234
contraction lks

# word mange 134									# defined in level 1
word manges 134-234
contraction ms
# word med 146										# defined in level 1
endword med 146
begword med 146
begword umed 136-146

word meg 134-1245
contraction mg
word meget 134-346
word mellom 134-123
begword mellom 134-123
contraction ml
endword mellom 134-123
word min 134-1345
contraction mn
word mitt 134-2345
contraction mt
# word mye 13456
word mykje 134-13
contraction mk
word måtta 134-2345-1
contraction mta
word måtte 134-1256
word måttet 134-2345-346
